Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 18.1 Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act

9-18.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Foreign jurisdiction” means a state other than this state.

“Foreign subpoena” means a subpoena issued under authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited-liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Subpoena” means a document, however denominated, issued under authority of a court of record requiring a person to:

Attend and give testimony at a deposition;

Produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of the person; or

Permit inspection of premises under the control of the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-3.
Issuance of subpoena.

To request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party shall submit a foreign subpoena to:

A clerk of the superior court in the county in which discovery is sought to be conducted in this state; or

A lawyer who is a member in good standing of the bar of this state. A request for the issuance of a subpoena under this act does not constitute an appearance in the courts of this state.

When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of the superior court in this state, the clerk, in accordance with the court’s procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service on the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed. When a party submits a subpoena to a lawyer who is a member in good standing of the bar of this state, the lawyer may issue a subpoena for service on the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed.

A subpoena under subsection (b) of this section shall:

Incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena;

Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, telephone numbers, and email addresses of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party not represented by counsel; and

Otherwise be in a form that complies with the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-4.
Service of subpoena.

A subpoena issued under §

9-18.1-3

shall be served in compliance with the Rhode Island superior court rules of civil procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-5.
Deposition, production, and inspection.

The Rhode Island superior court rules of civil procedure govern subpoenas issued under §

9-18.1-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-6.
Application to court.

An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued under §

9-18.1-3

shall comply with the rules or statutes of this state and be submitted to the superior court in the county in which discovery is to be conducted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-7.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.

9-18.1-8.
Application to pending actions.

This chapter applies to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 15, 2019.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 241, § 1.